Hawaii statutes.
§467-3 Commission, appointments,
qualifications, tenure. There shall be appointed a commission to be known
as the real estate commission, to consist of nine members, at least four of
whom shall be licensed real estate brokers who have been engaged in business as
licensed real estate brokers or salespersons for three years immediately
preceding their appointments, each of whom shall be a citizen of the United
States and shall have resided in the State for at least three years preceding
appointment, and one of whom shall be designated by the appointing power as
chairperson. Four members shall be residents of the city and county of
Honolulu, one shall be a resident of the county of Hawaii, one shall be a
resident of the county of Maui, and one shall be a resident of the county of
Kauai and two members shall be public members.

Appointments shall be made for a term of four
years, commencing from the date of expiration of the last preceding term and
shall be made to expire on June 30. Appointments shall be made so that at
least one appointment shall be required each year.

Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment for
the unexpired term. [L 1933, c 140, §§2, 3; RL 1935, §7312; am L 1935, c 126,
§1; RL 1945, §7733; am L 1951, c 77, §1; RL 1955, §170-3; am L 1959, c 165, §1;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§5, 15; am L 1961, c 154, §3; HRS §467-3; am L 1978, c
208, §14; am L 1980, c 60, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 130, §4; am L 1989, c
217, §2; am L 1992, c 202, §167; ree L 1993, c 322, §16]

Cross References

Departmental administration, see §§26-9 and 26-35.

Quorum, see §92-15.

Case Notes

Cited: 38 H. 9 (1948).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next